Maine, session 132, LD661.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1752, sub-§11, as amended by PL 2011, c. 8, §2, is further
amended to read:
11. Low-speed vehicle. A low-speed vehicle registered pursuant to section 501,
subsection 11. A low-speed vehicle must be equipped in accordance with section 1925;
and
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1752, sub-§12, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 8, §3, is amended
to read:
12. Antique motorcycle. An antique motorcycle registered under section 457.; and
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1752, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Class C license holder; new motor vehicles. A new motor vehicle that a holder
of a Class C license is authorized to operate pursuant to section 1252, subsection 1,
paragraph C is not required to have an inspection until 3 years from the last day of the
month in which it was manufactured unless:
A. Parts of the motor vehicle required to be inspected are damaged in a motor vehicle
collision or natural disaster. If the motor vehicle is damaged, the motor vehicle must
be inspected pursuant to section 1751 upon repair; or
B. The ownership of the vehicle is transferred.